Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-135
Standards; hearing and notice.

No county shall adopt standards or amendments to such standards pursuant to section 68-133 or 68-134 without first holding a public hearing to permit discussion and the presentation of testimony or evidence by interested persons. Notice of such hearing shall be published not more than twenty days nor less than ten days prior to the hearing in a newspaper in general circulation throughout the county.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 5.